test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-siltteed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - siltteed: # Verb 'to know how / osata' - full paradigm
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: silttääm
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: silttääk
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: silttad
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: siltteep
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: siltteʹped
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: silttee 
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: siltteet
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: siltteem
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: silttiiǩ
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: silttii
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [silttiim, silttiin]
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: silttiid
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: silttee
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: siltteeš
     siltteed+V+Pot+Sg1: siltteʹžem
     siltteed+V+Pot+Sg2: siltteʹžiǩ
     siltteed+V+Pot+Sg3: siltteež
     siltteed+V+Pot+Pl1: [siltteʹžep, siltteʹžim, siltteʹžin]
     siltteed+V+Pot+Pl2: siltteʹžid 
     siltteed+V+Pot+Pl3: siltteʹže
     siltteed+V+Pot+Sg4: siltteʹžet
     siltteed+V+Pot+ConNeg: siltteʹže
     siltteed+V+Cond+Sg1: siltteʹčem
     siltteed+V+Cond+Sg2: siltteʹčiǩ
     siltteed+V+Cond+Sg3: siltteʹči
     siltteed+V+Cond+Pl1: [siltteʹčim, siltteʹčin, siltteʹčep]
     siltteed+V+Cond+Pl2: siltteʹčid
     siltteed+V+Cond+Pl3: siltteʹče
     siltteed+V+Cond+Sg4: siltteʹčeš
     siltteed+V+Cond+ConNeg: siltteʹče
     siltteed+V+Imprt+Sg2: silttâd
     siltteed+V+Imprt+Sg3: silttââǥǥas
     siltteed+V+Imprt+Pl1: silttâkap
     siltteed+V+Imprt+Pl2: [siltteʹǩed, siltteed]
     siltteed+V+Imprt+Pl3: silttâkaz
     siltteed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: silttuku
     siltteed+V+Actio+Ess: siltteʹmmen
     siltteed+V+Actio: [siltteem, siltteeʹm]
     siltteed+V+Act+PrsPrc: siltteei
     siltteed+V+Act+PrfPrc: [silttääm, silttäämma]
     siltteed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [silttummu, silttuum]
     siltteed+V+VAbess: siltteeǩâni
     siltteed+V+Ger+Ess: siltteeʹn
     siltteed+V+Ger+Instr: siltteeʹl
